test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_luuhad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Verb - luuhâđ: # MLO checked; also imperative checked
    luuhâđ+V+Inf: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luuvâm
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: luuvah
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lohá
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: lohheen
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: luhâvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: luuhâv
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: luuhâp
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: luhâvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: loheh
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luuhim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: luuhih
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luuvâi
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: luuváim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: luuváid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: luuváin
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: luuvâim
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: luuvâid
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luhhii
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: luvâččim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: luvâččih
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: luvâččij
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du1: luvâččáim
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du2: luvâččáid
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Du3: luvâččáin
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: luvâččijm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: luvâččijd
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: luvâččii
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: lohheem
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: lohheeh
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: luuvâš
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du1: luvâžeen
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du2: luuvâšvettee
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Du3: luvâžává
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: luvâžep
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: luuvâšvetteđ
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: luvâžeh
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: lohhoom 
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: luuvâ
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: lovos
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: lohhoon
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: lohhoos
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: luhhup
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: luuhâđ
    luuhâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: lohhoos
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luuvâ
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: luvâččii
    luuhâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: luuvii
    luuhâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Neg: luuvâ
    luuhâđ+V+PrsPrc: lohhee
    luuhâđ+V+PrfPrc: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio: luuhâm
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ess: luhâmin
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Loc: luhâmist
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Ill: luhâmân
    luuhâđ+V+Actio+Com: luvâdijn
    luuhâđ+V+VAbess: luvâhánnáá


  Verb - njaahâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative should be added
    njaahâđ+V+Inf: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaavâm
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: njaavah
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njááhá
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: njähheen
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: njahâvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: njaahâv
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: njaahâp
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: njahâvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: njäähih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: njaahim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: njaahih
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: njaavâi
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: njaaváim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: njaaváid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: njaaváin
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: njaavâim
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: njaavâid
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: njahhii
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: njavâččim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: njavâččih
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: njavâččij
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du1: njavâččáim
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du2: njavâččáid
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Du3: njavâččáin
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: njavâččijm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: njavâččijd
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: njavâččii
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: njähheem
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: njähheeh
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: njaavâš
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du1: njavâžeen
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du2: njaavâšvettee
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Du3: njavâžává
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: njavâžep
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: njaavâšvetteđ
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: njavâžeh
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: njáhhoom
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: njaavâ
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: njáávus
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: njáhhoon
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: njähhee
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: njááhus
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: njááhup
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: njaahâđ
    njaahâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: njááhus
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njaavâ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: njavâččii
    njaahâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: njaavii
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Neg: njaavâ
    njaahâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: njavâččii
    njaahâđ+V+PrsPrc: njähhee
    njaahâđ+V+PrfPrc: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio: njaahâm
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ess: njahâmin
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Loc: njahâmist
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Ill: njahâmân
    njaahâđ+V+Actio+Com: njavâdijn
    njaahâđ+V+VAbe: njavâhânnáá

  Verb - kiessâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    kiessâđ+V+Inf: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâm
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kiesah
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäsá
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kiesseen
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kiesâvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kiessâv
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kiessâp
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kiesâvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kiesih
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kiessim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kiessih
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kiesâi
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kiesáim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kiesáid
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kiesáin
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kiesâim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kiesâid
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kiessii
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: kiesâččim
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: kiesâččih
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: kiesâččij
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Du1: kiesâččáim
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Du2: kiesâččáid
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Du3: kiesâččáin
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: kiesâččijm
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: kiesâččijd
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: kiesâččii
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: kiesseem
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: kiesseeh
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: kiesâš
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Du1: kiesâžeen
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Du2: kiesâšvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Du3: kiesâžává
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: kiesâžep
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: kiesâšvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: kiesâžeh
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: kiässoom
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kiesâ
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kiäsus
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kiässoon
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kiessee
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kiässus
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kiässup
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kiässus
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: kiesâččii
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: [kiesii, kiessii]
    kiessâđ+V+PrsPrc: kiessee
    kiessâđ+V+PrfPrc: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Actio: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kiesâmin
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kiesâmist
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kiesâmân
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Com: kiesâdijn
    kiessâđ+V+VAbess: kiesâhánnáá

  Verb - moonnâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    moonnâđ+V+Inf: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: moonâm
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: moonah
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: manâ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: manneen
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: monâvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: moonnâv
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: moonnâp
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: monâvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: maneh
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: moonnim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: moonnih
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: moonâi
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: moonáim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: moonáid
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: moonáin
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: moonâim
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: moonâid
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: monnii
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: monâččim
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: monâččih
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: monâččij
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du1: monâččáim
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du2: monâččáid
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Du3: monâččáin
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: monâččijm
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: monâččijd
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: monâččii
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: maaneem
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: maaneeh
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: moonâš
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du1: monâžeen
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du2: moonâšvettee
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Du3: monâžává
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: monâžep
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: moonâšvetteđ
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: monâžeh
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: mannoom
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: moonâ
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: manos
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: mannoon
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: mannee
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: mannoos
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: mannoop
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: moonnâđ
    moonnâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: mannoos
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: moonâ
    moonnâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: monâččii
    moonnâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: moonii
    moonnâđ+V+PrsPrc: mannee
    moonnâđ+V+PrfPrc: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Actio: moonnâm
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Ess: monâmin
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Loc: monâmist
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Ill: monâmân
    moonnâđ+V+Actio+Com: monâdijn
    moonnâđ+V+VAbess: monâhánnáá

  Verb - viiššâđ: # MLO, checked, imperative added
    viiššâđ+V+Inf: [viiššâđ, viššâđ]
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viišâm
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viišah
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: višá
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viššeen
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: višâvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viiššâv
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viiššâp
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: višâvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: višeh
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viiššim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viišših
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viišâi
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viišáim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viišáid
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: viišáin
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viišâim
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viišâid
    viiššâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viššii
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Sg1: višâččim
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Sg2: višâččih
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Sg3: višâččij
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Du1: višâččáim
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Du2: višâččáid
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Du3: višâččáin
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Pl1: višâččijm
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Pl2: višâččijd
    viiššâđ+V+Cond+Pl3: višâččii
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Sg1: viišeem
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Sg2: viišeeh
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Sg3: viišâš
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Du1: višâžeen
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Du2: viišâšvettee
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Du3: višâžává
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Pl1: višâžep
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Pl2: viišâšvetteđ
    viiššâđ+V+Pot+Pl3: višâžeh
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: viššoom
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viišâ
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: višos
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: viššoon
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: viššee
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: viššoos
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: viššoop
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [viiššâđ, viššâđ] 
    viissâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: viššoos
    viissâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viišâ
    viissâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viiššâm
    viissâđ+V+Cond+ConNeg: višâččii
    viissâđ+V+Pot+ConNeg: [viišii, viššii]
    viiššâđ+V+PrsPrc: viššee
    viiššâđ+V+PrfPrc: [viiššâm, viššâm]
    viiššâđ+V+Actio: [viiššâm, viššâm]
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Ess: višâmin
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Loc: višâmist
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Ill: višâmân
    viiššâđ+V+Actio+Com: višâdijn
    viiššâđ+V+VAbess: višâhánnáá
